hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási gépek > Klímaszabályozási készülékek > Légkondicionálók: Hordozható klímaberendezések; Split rendszerű klímaberendezések; Falba építhető klímaberendezések; Ablakklímák
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski aparati > Naprave za nadzor klime > Klimatske naprave: Prenosne klimatske naprave; Klimatske naprave z razdeljenim sistemom; Klimatske naprave za vgradnjo skozi steno; Okenske klimatske naprave
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aletleri > Hava Kontrol Aygıtları > Klimalar: Taşınabilir Klimalar; Split Sistem Klimalar; Duvar Tipi Klimalar; Pencere Tipi Klimalar
es: Casa y jardín > Electrodomésticos > Control del clima > Sistemas de aire acondicionado: Aires acondicionados portátiles; Aires acondicionados de sistema Split; Aires acondicionados de pared; Aires acondicionados de ventana
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliances > Climate Control Appliances > Air Conditioners: Portable Air Conditioners; Split System Air Conditioners; Through-the-Wall Air Conditioners; Window Air Conditioners
pl: Dom i ogród > Sprzęt AGD > Ogrzewanie, wentylacja i klimatyzacja > Klimatyzatory: Klimatyzatory przenośne; Klimatyzatory typu split; Klimatyzatory ścienne; Klimatyzatory okienne
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneet > Ilmastointi > Ilmastointilaitteet: Kannettavat ilmastointilaitteet; Ilmalämpöpumput; Seinän läpi asennettavat ilmastointilaitteet; Ikkunan asennettavat ilmastointilaitteet
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품 > 냉난방 가전 > 에어컨: 휴대용 에어컨; 스플릿형 에어컨; 벽걸이 관통형 에어컨; 창문형 에어컨
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Domáce spotrebiče > Klimatizačné spotrebiče > Klimatizácie: Prenosné klimatizácie; Split systémy klimatizácií; Klimatizácie do steny; Okenné klimatizácie
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Домакински уреди > Уреди за контрол на климата > Климатици: Преносими климатици; Климатици със сплитсистеми; Климатици за стенен монтаж; Прозоречни климатици
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家用电器 > 环境调节设备 > 空调: 便携式空调; 分体式空调; 壁挂式空调; 窗式空调
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Eletrodomésticos > Equipamento de controlo climático > Sistemas de ar condicionado: Ar condicionado portátil; Ar condicionado de sistema Split; Ar condicionado de parede; Ar condicionado de janela
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Οικιακές συσκευές > Συσκευές ελέγχου κλίματος > Κλιματιστικά: Φορητά κλιματιστικά; Κλιματιστικά τύπου split; Κλιματιστικά τοίχου; Κλιματιστικά παραθύρου
vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị gia dụng > Thiết bị điều hòa không khí > Máy điều hòa: Máy điều hòa di động; Máy điều hòa hai khối; Máy điều hòa lắp xuyên tường; Máy điều hòa cửa sổ
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kućanski aparati > Uređaji za kontrolu klime > Klima uređaji: Prijenosni klima uređaji; Klima uređaji sa split sustavima; Klima uređaji za ugradnju kroz zid; Prozorski klima uređaji
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsapparater > Klimakontrollapparater > Klimaanlegg: Bærbare klimaanlegg; Split-system klimaanlegg; Gjennom-vegg klimaanlegg; Vindusklimaanlegg
fr: Maison et jardin > Appareils électroménagers > Chauffage et climatisation > Climatiseurs: Climatiseurs portables; Climatiseurs Split; Climatiseurs muraux; Climatiseurs de fenêtre
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater > Klimakontroludstyr > Klimaanlæg: Bærbare klimaanlæg; Klimaanlæg med splitsystem; Klimaanlæg gennem væggen; Klimaanlæg til vinduet
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Eletrodomésticos > Controle climático > Aparelhos de ar condicionado: Ares-condicionados portáteis; Ares-condicionados de sistema split; Ares-condicionados de parede; Ares-condicionados de janela
th: บ้านและสวน > เครื่องใช้ภายในบ้าน > อุปกรณ์ควบคุมสภาพอากาศ > เครื่องปรับอากาศ: เครื่องปรับอากาศแบบพกพา; เครื่องปรับอากาศแบบแยกส่วน; เครื่องปรับอากาศแบบติดตั้งผ่านผนัง; เครื่องปรับอากาศแบบหน้าต่าง
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器 > 空調設備 > 空調: 移動式空調; 分離式空調; 穿牆式空調; 窗型空調
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče > Klimatizační zařízení > Klimatizace: Přenosné klimatizace; Splitové klimatizace; Klimatizace do zdi; Okenní klimatizace
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Electrocasnice > Aparate de climatizare > Aparate de aer condiționat: Aparate de aer condiționat portabile; Aparate de aer condiționat split; Aparate de aer condiționat cu montare prin perete; Aparate de aer condiționat cu montare la fereastră
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電 > 冷暖房空調設備 > エアコン: ポータブルエアコン; 分離型エアコン; 壁貫通型エアコン; 窓用エアコン
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsapparater > Apparater för klimatkontroll > Luftkonditionerare: Bärbara luftkonditioneringsapparater; Split-luftkonditioneringar; Luftkonditioneringar med väggenomföring; Fönsterluftkonditioneringar
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte > Klimatisierung > Klimaanlagen: Tragbare Klimaanlagen; Split-Klimaanlagen; Wandklimaanlagen; Fensterklimaanlagen
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke apparaten > Klimaatregeling > Airconditioning: Draagbare airconditioners; Split-systeem airconditioners; Wandairconditioners; Raamairconditioners
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinė technika > Klimato kontrolės prietaisai > Oro kondicionieriai: Nešiojamieji oro kondicionieriai; Split sistemos oro kondicionieriai; Sieniniai oro kondicionieriai; Langiniai oro kondicionieriai
ru: Дом и сад > Бытовая техника > Климатическая техника > Кондиционеры: Портативные кондиционеры; Сплит-системы кондиционирования воздуха; Настенные кондиционеры; Оконные кондиционеры
it: Casa e giardino > Dispositivi elettrodomestici > Controllo climatizzazione > Condizionatori aria: Condizionatori d'aria portatili; Condizionatori d'aria Split system; Condizionatori d'aria a parete; Condizionatori d'aria da finestra